Maryland, session 2025, SB0734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
17–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Storage warehouse” means a building or structure used for keeping
goods for a fee.
(2) “STORAGE WAREHOUSE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A SELF–SERVICE
STORAGE FACILITY.
(c) “Storage warehouse license” means a license issued by the clerk to keep a
storage warehouse.
17–1202.
A person must have a storage warehouse license whenever the person keeps a
storage warehouse where goods are stored for a fee in the State.
– 1 –

Ch. 358 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –